Mississippi, session 2026, HB718.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 27-33-51, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 27-33-51.  The tax collectors of the several counties of the state shall perform such duties as are generally imposed upon them by the laws of this state with respect to the collection of taxes and the payment of same into the proper accounts; and in addition to such general duties: (a)  He shall, upon receipt of a duly certified copy of the order of the board of supervisors, adopted under the provisions of Section 27-33-37(l), correct the supplemental roll as required by said order and list as subject to all taxes the assessed value of homes in all cases to the extent directed by the order of the board; and he shall change the supplemental roll for the year, or years, in accord with the order of the board, so as to show the additional taxes due and he shall prepare a tax receipt therefor, with proper references thereon to the board, the year or years for which the additional taxes are levied, and to the page and line of the supplemental roll where the assessment is listed. (b)  He shall collect all additional taxes on or before the first day of February of the year following that in which the notice is issued to make the correction and reassessment, and the collection of taxes shall be made in the same manner and at the same time taxes are collected on other property, if any, of the same owner; and he shall give to the taxpayer a separate receipt for such additional taxes. (c)  He shall give to all taxpayers having an exempted home under the terms of this article a tax receipt made in the manner and form directed by Sections 27-41-33 and 27-41-35; and this requirement shall apply to receipts given for additional taxes as provided by paragraphs (a) and (b) of this section. (d)  He shall collect all taxes due to the extent required by this article; and it shall be his duty to collect said taxes, including additional taxes as provided by paragraphs (a) and (b) of this section, by sale of the property in the manner provided by law in the case of other real property, and by any other method or means provided by law for the collection of taxes levied against real property. In addition to any other provisions of this section or any other law, for taxes collected on property for which homestead exemption is disapproved or disallowed because a taxpayer or the taxpayer's spouse has failed to comply with the income tax laws of this state as provided in Section 27-33-63, the tax collector shall remit to the Department of Revenue an amount equal to the additional tax paid on the property due to homestead exemption being disapproved or disallowed for the property, not to exceed the amount of the obligation for which the taxpayer or taxpayer's spouse is not in compliance with the income tax laws of this state. The Department of Revenue shall apply such amount against the taxpayer's income tax obligation. SECTION 2.  Section 27-41-77, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 27-41-77.  If any land be sold for more than the amount of taxes due and all costs, the tax collector shall report the amount of excess to the chancery clerk, and on his receipt warrant therefor, shall pay the same into the county treasury.  The board of supervisors is directed to transfer all such funds so received to the general funds of the county.  If the land be redeemed, or the title of the purchaser be defeated or set aside in any way or for any reason, such excess shall be retained by the county.  If only a part of the land be redeemed, the excess shall be apportioned ratably to the amount of taxes due at the time of the sale on the respective parts.  The owner of the land may demand of the tax collector a memorandum or receipt showing the amount of excess if any, and, upon the expiration of the period of redemption, without the property being redeemed, such excess shall, upon the request of the owner, be paid to said owner.  If the owner of the property does not request payment of the excess within two (2) years from the expiration of the period of redemption, the excess shall be retained by the county.  Whenever any person shall present a claim against the excess fund, within the time period provided, certified to by the chancery clerk, the board of supervisors shall order a warrant to issue therefor on the general county fund. SECTION 3.  Section 27-45-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 27-45-1.  Redemption of land sold for taxes shall be made through the chancery clerks of the respective counties.  Where the land was sold to the state, the clerk, out of the amount necessary to redeem, shall first pay to the officers entitled thereto the costs, fees and damages which are allowed those officers by law in cases of lands sold to individuals; second, he shall pay the state the amount of state taxes with the interest and additional charges thereon allowed by law to the state; and, third, he shall pay to the county the sums computed in like manner which belong to the county and the various taxing districts thereof.  Where the land was sold to an individual, the clerk shall pay: (a)  First, to the state the amount of state taxes with the interest and additional charges thereon allowed by law, unless same has been paid previously by the tax purchaser or some other person; (b)  Second, to the county the sums computed in like manner which belong to the county and the various taxing districts thereof, unless same has been paid previously by the tax purchaser or some other person; (c)  Third, to the county the five percent (5%) damages on the amount of the taxes for which the land was sold; and (d)  Fourth, the balance to the purchaser. The clerk shall make his redemption settlements within twenty (20) days after the end of each month and shall make a complete report thereof to the board of supervisors.  For a failure so to report or to pay over the sums to the parties entitled thereto as herein required, he shall be liable on his official bond to a penalty of one percent (1%) per month on the amount withheld.  The chancery clerk shall also note each redemption on the public record of delinquent tax lands, on the day payment of taxes is made, with the date, name and the amount of redemption money paid. SECTION 4.  Section 27-45-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 27-45-5.  It shall be the duty of the chancery clerk of each county in the state to immediately deposit in the county depository of his county all sums of money paid to him by any person for the redemption of land sold for taxes in his county; all such funds are hereby declared to be public funds, and shall be secured by the county depository, as other public funds are required to be secured by law.  The board of supervisors of each county shall provide the clerk with printed checks in the form of vouchers, with proper blanks, bound in book form with a sufficient blank margin to be used in drawing redemption funds out of the county depository; all such checks shall be numbered in numerical order, and it shall be the duty of the clerk to draw on such funds upon such checks as herein provided in payment of all amounts due the officers and purchasers out of said funds.  He shall first pay the officers entitled to their costs, fees, and damages which are allowed to said officers by law; and he shall then pay to the purchasers at any such tax sale, the full amount due him as provided by law. It shall be the duty of the state auditor of public accounts to audit such account of each clerk, as other public funds are audited; and he shall include in said audit a special report to the board of supervisors of his county setting out in detail the amounts collected, and the disposition of such funds, and the balance on hand, and attest to the correctness thereof. If such clerk shall neglect, refuse or fail to deposit such funds received by him as herein provided, he shall be guilty of misfeasance in office, and in addition thereto shall be liable on his official bond to any person injured by his failure to deposit such funds in the county depository as herein provided. SECTION 5.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.